GAGAVUZ.twol
Alphabet

    A Ä Â B C Ç D E Ê F G H I İ J K L M N O Ö P R S Ş Ș T Ţ Ț U Ü V Y Z
    a ä â b c ç d e ê f g h ı i j k l m n o ö p r s ş ș t ţ ț u ü v y z

    і

    %{A%}:a %{A%}:ä  %{A%}:ê 
    %{E%}:ê %{E%}:e 
    %{I%}:ı %{I%}:i %{I%}:u %{I%}:ü

    %{i%}:ı %{i%}:i %{i%}:u %{i%}:ü %{i%}:0
    %{y%}:u %{y%}:i %{y%}:ı %{y%}:ü %{y%}:0
    %{a%}:a %{a%}:e
   

    %{s%}:s %{s%}:0 
    %{й%}:y %{й%}:0
    %{N%}:n %{N%}:0

    %{L%}:l %{L%}:n
    %{л%}:l %{л%}:n
    %{T%}:t %{T%}:d
    %{к%}:k %{к%}:g
    %{D%}:d %{D%}:t

    %{h%}:h %{h%}:0
    %{k%}:k
    %{n%}:n %{n%}:0
    %{в%}:y %{в%}:0
    %{и%}:i %{и%}:0

    %{e%}:e  
    %{u%}:u 

    %{ö%}:0 ! Front rounded
    %{o%}:0 ! Back rounded
    %{ь%}:0 ! Front
    %{ъ%}:0 ! Back

    %{·%}:0 
    %{☭%}:0 
    %>:0
    %-
    %+ % 

;

Sets

Consonants = B C Ç D  F G H  J K L M N  P R S Ş Ș T Ţ Ț V Y Z
      b c ç d  f g h  j k l m n  p r s ş ș t ţ ț v y z ;

Vowels = A E Ê Ä İ I O Ö U Ü  
        a e ê ä i ı o ö u ü і ; ! Final 'i' is Cyrl

HardVowels = A Â O I U
          a â o ı u ;

SoftVowels = E Ä İ Ö Ü
          e ä i ö ü і ; ! Final 'i' is Cyrl

RoundVowels = O Ö U Ü
           o ö u ü ;

FlatVowels = A Â E İ I 
          a â e i ı і ; ! Final 'i' is Cyrl
 
NasalCons = n m 
           N M ;

ConsVocals   = F S T K Ç Ş H P 
            f s t k ç ş h p ;

ArchiCons = %{k%} %{в%} %{h%} ; 

Rules 

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                      V O W E L · H A R M O N Y 
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

"Vowel harmony for archiphoneme {E}"
%{E%}:Vy <=> :Vx [ :Consonants | %k%}: | %{h}: | %-: ]+/:0* _ ;
          Vx: %{.%}: %>: _ ;
    where Vx in ( a â ä e ê o ö u ü ı i і )
          Vy in ( ê ê e e ê ê e ê e ê e e )
    matched ; 
 
"Vowel harmony for archiphoneme {I}"
%{I%}:Vy <=> :Vx  [ :Consonants | %{k%}: | %{h%}: | %-: ]+/:0* _ ; 
    except
          :Vx [ %{k%}: | %{h%}: ] %>: %{s%}: _ %{n%}: ; 
    where Vx in ( a â ä e ê o ö u ü ı i і )
          Vy in ( ı ı i i ı u ü u ü ı i i )
    matched ;

!@ 5:5 -:- >:0 c:c {I}:i    

"Vowel harmony for archiphoneme {I} with assimilation"
%{I%}:Vy <=> :Vx [ %{k%}: | %{h%}: ] %>: %{s%}: _ %{n%}: ; 
    where Vx in ( a â ä e ê o ö u ü ı i і )
          Vy in ( a a ä e a a i u ü ı i i )
    matched ;

!@ t:t o:o p:p r:r a:a {k}:0 >:0 {s}:0 {I}:a {n}:n >:0 {й}:0 {A}:a 

"Vowel harmony for archiphoneme {A}"
%{A%}:Vy <=> :Vx  [ :Consonants | %{k%}: | %{h%}: | %-: ]+/:0* _ ; 
    except 
        %{a%}: c %{e%}: k %>: %{L%}: _ ;
    where Vx in ( a ä e ê o ö u ü ı i і )
          Vy in ( a ä ä a a ä a ä a ä ä )
    matched ;

!@ y:y a:a p:p >:0 {E}:a r:r >:0 {D}:d {I}:ı >:0 {L}:l {A}:a r:r

!@ o:o l:l >:0 {й}:0 {A}:a c:c >:0 {e}:e k:k >:0 {L}:l {A}:a r:r

"Vowel harmony in the future suffix with plural"
%{A%}:Vy <=> %{a%}:Vx c %{e%}: k %>: %{L%}: _ ; 
    where Vx in ( a ä e ê )
          Vy in ( a ä ä a )
    matched ;

"Vowel harmony for archiphoneme {a}"
%{a%}:Vy <=> :Vx  [ :Consonants | %{k%}: | %{h%}: | %-: ]+/:0* _ ; 
    where Vx in ( a ä e ê o ö u ü ı i і )
          Vy in ( a e e a a e a e a e e )
    matched ;

"Deletion of {i} after surface vowel"
%{i%}:0 <=> :Consonants/:0* :Vowels %>: _ ;

!@ r:r u:u b:b r:r i:i k:k a:a >:0 {i}:0 m:m {I}:ı z:z >:0 {D}:d {A}:a 

"Surfacing of {i} with assimilation"
%{i%}:a <=> :a %{k%}: %>: _ ; 

!@ t:t o:o p:p r:r a:a {k}:0 >:0 {i}:a m:m {I}:ı z:z >:0 {D}:d {A}:a 

!"Vowel harmony for archiphoneme {i}"
!%{i%}:Vy <=> :Vx  [ :Consonants | %{k%}: | %{h%}: | %-: ]+/:0* _ ; 
!    where Vx in ( a ä e ê o ö u ü ı i і )
!          Vy in ( a e e a a e a e a e e )
!    matched ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                          E P E N T H E S I S
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

"{й}  become y when intervocalic"
%{й%}:y <=> :Vowels ([ :0 - [ %{k%}: | %{h%}: ] ]) %>: _ (:Consonants) :Vowels ;

"{s} become 0 when intervocalic"
%{s%}:0 <=> [ ArchiCons: | Consonants: ] %>: _ :Vowels ;

!@ ç:ç o:o c:c u:u {k}:0 >:0 {s}:0 {I}:u {n}:0 >:0 {N}:n {I}:u n:n

"Epenthetic i in consonant clusters"
%{и%}:0 <=> _ .#. ; 

!@ s:s p:p e:e k:k t:t a:a k:k l:l {и}:i >:0 {й}:y i:i

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                   A S S I M I L A T I O N 
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

"{L} changed to n when after a Nasal consonant"
%{L%}:n <=> :NasalCons  %>: _ ; 

"Consonant elision intervocalic"
Cx:0 <=> :Vowels _ %>: :Vowel/:0* ;
      where Cx in ( %{k%} %{h%} ) ;

"Vowel assimilation in dative"
Vx:a <=> _ [ %{h%}:0 | %{k%}:0 ] %>: %{й%}: %{A%}:  ;
     where Vx in ( u ı ) ;

!@ ç:ç o:o c:c u:a {k}:0 >:0 {й}:0 {A}:a

!@ p:p a:a d:d i:i ş:ş a:a {h}:0 >:0 {й}:0 {A}:a

!@ u:u r:r o:o {k}:0 >:0 {й}:0 {A}:o  !!??!!

"{D} changed to t when after a stem-final voiceless consonant" 
%{D%}:t <=> :ConsVocls/:0* %>: (:0) _ ;

!@ y:y o:o k:k >:0 {й}:0 {D}:t {I}:u r:r

"{T} change to d before vowels "
%{T%}:d  <=>  _ (:0) %>: (:0) :Vowel  ; 

!@ g:g i:i {T}:d >:0 {й}:0 {a}:e c:c {A}:ä >:0 m:m

"Voicing of non-coronal stem-final voiceless consonants"
Cx:Cy <=> :Vowel/:0* _ %>: :Vowel/:0* ;
     except
                     _ %{☭%}: %>: ; 
                     _ %{·%}: %>: ; 
      where Cx in ( p t )
            Cy in ( b d )
      matched ;

"Nasalisation of nk followed by vowel"
%{к%}:g <=> n _ %>: :Vowels/:0* ; 

!@ c:c e:e n:n {к}:g >:0 {й}:0 {A}:ä

"Vowel assimilation in the present"
Vx:Vy <=> _ %{·%}: %>: %{E%}:Vy ;
      where Vx in ( ä a ) 
            Vy in ( e ê ) 
      matched ;

!@ y:y o:o l:l l:l a:ê {·}:0 >:0 {E}:ê r:r >:0 {I}:ı m:m

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                   M O R P H O L O G Y 
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

"delete {n} before genitive case and -DIr modality "
%{n%}:0 <=>  _ %>: %{N%}:   ;
             _ %>: %{й%}: %{D%}: %{I%}: ; 

!@ a:a n:n a:a >:0 {s}:s {I}:ı {n}:0 >:0 {й}:y {D}:d {I}:ı r:r

"{n} become 0 at the end "
%{n%}:0 <=>  _ .#. ;

"No {N} after consonant"
%{N%}:0 <=> [ ArchiCons: | Consonants: ]/:0* %>: _ ;

!@ a:a y:y >:0 {N}:0 {I}:ı n:n

!@ ş:ş k:k o:o l:l a:a >:0 {N}:n {I}:ı n:n

!@ ç:ç o:o c:c u:u {k}:0 >:0 {N}:0 {I}:u n:n

!@ ç:ç o:o c:c u:u {k}:0 >:0 {s}:0 {I}:u {n}:0 >:0 {N}:n {I}:u n:n

"The final consonant in su-"
%{в%}:0 <=> _ .#. ; 
            _ %>: [ %{L%}: | %{D%}: ] ;

!@ s:s u:u {в}:0

!@ s:s u:u {в}:0 >:0 {L}:l {A}:a r:r

!@ s:s u:u {в}:y >:0 {N}:0 {I}:u n:n

!@ s:s u:u {в}:y >:0 {s}:0 {I}:u {n}:n >:0 {N}:0 {I}:u n:n

!@ s:s u:u {в}:y >:0 {s}:0 {I}:u {n}:n >:0 {й}:0 {A}:a

!@ s:s u:u {в}:y >:0 {s}:0 {I}:u {n}:n >:0 {й}:0 {I}:u

!@ s:s u:u {в}:y >:0 {й}:0 {A}:a 

!@ s:s u:u {в}:0 >:0 {D}:d {A}:a 

!@ s:s u:u {в}:y >:0 {й}:0 {I}:u

!@ s:s u:u {в}:y >:0 {й}:0 {L}:l {A}:a 

"{л} to n in passive following l"
%{л%}:n <=> :l/:0* %{i%}: _ ;

!@ b:b i:i l:l {·}:0 >:0 {i}:i {л}:n >:0 {D}:d {I}:i
